Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 3. State Financial Support
§ 21-13-310.
Annual computation of district revenues.

To ensure revenues available to each district are uniformly sufficient to enable compliance with the uniform standards for educational programs prescribed under W.S.

21-9-101

and

21-9-102

and to secure state board accreditation of educational programs under W.S. 21-2-304(a)(ii), the revenues specified under this subsection shall be deemed state revenues and shall be considered in determining the amount to be distributed to each district under W.S.

21-13-311

. A district shall make an annual computation of the following revenues:

The revenue collections estimated to be received by each district during the school year as its proportionate share of the county six (6) mill levy imposed under W.S. 21-13-201(a) as certified on August 10 under W.S.

39-11-102

.1(c)(v) for that school year;

The required local tax effort in the current school year for the assessment and levy of school taxes by the district according to the following schedule:

Any district actually and physically operating a school within the boundaries of the district offering instruction in kindergarten through grade twelve (12), the amount of revenue collections estimated to be received during the school year under the twenty-five (25) mill local district levy as certified on August 10 under W.S.

39-11-102

.1(c)(v) for that school year;

Any nonunified district actually and physically operating a school within the boundaries of the district offering instruction in kindergarten through grade eight (8), the amount of revenue collections estimated to be received during the school year under the number of mills levied pursuant to W.S. 21-13-102(a)(ii)(A), as certified on August 10 under W.S. 39-11-102.1(c)(v) for that school year.

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 43, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 12, § 3.

The district’s share of fines and forfeitures distributed to it during the previous school year, including penalties distributed under W.S. 35-11-424(c);

The district’s share of forest reserve funds distributed to it during the previous year under W.S.

9-4-504

;

The district’s share of Taylor Grazing Act funds distributed to it during the previous school year under W.S.

9-4-402

;

The district’s share of the county motor vehicle fund distributed to it during the previous school year by the county treasurer under W.S.

31-3-103

;

The amount of tuition paid to the district during the previous school year, including any amount charged under W.S.

21-4-501

and any amount assessed in excess of the costs incurred for adult education programs, summer school programs, programs provided under an agreement for cooperative educational programs under W.S.

21-20-101

through

21-20-111

and any amount assessed for programs and services for children with disabilities, but excluding any tuition assessed by a district for the provision of virtual education programs to participating students pursuant to W.S.

21-13-330

, any tuition assessed by a district for the provision of part-time educational programs to participating students pursuant to W.S. 21-4-502(c), any revenues received by a district from post secondary education option programs provided under W.S.

21-20-201

or for the provision of educational programs to a nonresident student placed in a juvenile detention facility pursuant to an agreement with the student’s resident school district;

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 122, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 110, § 209.

The district’s share of interest and penalties on delinquent taxes under W.S. 39-13-108(b)(ii) and (c) distributed to it during the previous school year by the county treasurer;

The district’s share of railroad car company taxes distributed to it during the previous school year by the county treasurer under W.S. 39-13-111(a)(iii);

Except as provided under W.S. 21-15-123(f)(vi), any amount received by the district during the preceding school year from the sale of real or personal property which was not owned by the district prior to July 1, 1997;

All other revenues received or collected by the district during the previous school year, but excluding any amount received from private contributions and gifts, excluding any revenues dedicated by law to the payment of bonded indebtedness, and any revenues from the disposition of school buildings and land pursuant to W.S. 21-15-123(f)(vi), and excluding fees or other charges imposed by the district for goods or services, such as rental fees and the price paid for admission into any place for recreation, entertainment or an athletic event. Upon application of a district, the department shall exclude from this paragraph revenue received by the district if the department finds that the revenue could not be used by the district to provide educational services to students.

On or before July 10 of each year the county treasurer of each county shall certify to the state superintendent, in such form as the state superintendent shall provide, a report of monies distributed by him to each district within the county during the previous school year.

Annually, commencing on July 30, 1984, the state board of equalization, when determinable, shall certify to the department of education whether or not the level of local assessments for any category in each county is in accord with the requirements of the board of equalization and, if not, the percent by which the assessments are below the board’s requirements.

As used in this section, “revenue collections estimated to be received” means nonmineral ad valorem taxes due in accordance with W.S. 39-13-107(b)(i)(D) as certified on August 10 under W.S.

39-11-102

.1(c)(v) and monthly payment of ad valorem taxes on mineral production due in accordance with W.S.

39-13-113

.

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 260, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 122, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 107, § 2.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 119, § 6; 1957, ch. 174, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 21-68; Laws 1959, ch. 184, § 1; 1965, ch. 189, § 1; 1967, ch. 109, §§ 2 — 4; 1969, ch. 111, § 233; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-233; Laws 1971, ch. 265, § 2; 1973, ch. 165, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 1979, ch. 119, § 1; 1981, ch. 43, § 2; 1983, ch. 136, § 2; 1985, ch. 146, § 1; 1987, ch. 218, § 2; 1988, ch. 82, § 1; 1989, ch. 260, §§ 1, 3; 1990, ch. 122, § 2; 1991, ch. 229, § 1; 1992, ch. 48, § 1; ch. 91, § 7; 1993, ch. 107, §§ 1, 2; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 305; 1998, ch. 3, § 2; ch. 5, § 2; 1999, ch. 110, § 209; 2000, ch. 12, § 3; 2004, ch. 113, § 1; ch. 130, § 1; 2010, ch. 24, § 1; 2012, ch. 51, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2014 ch. 95, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2015 ch. 131, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2016 ch. 88, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 28, § 1, effective February 9, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to Taylor Grazing Act funds, see §

9-4-401

.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 113, § 1, in (a)(xiv), added the exception at the beginning; and, in (a)(xv), inserted “and any revenues from the disposition of school buildings and land pursuant to W.S. 21-15-114(a)(x).”

Laws 2004, ch. 113, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2004.

The second
2004 amendment, by ch. 130, § 1, in (a)(ii)(B), deleted “and (C)” following “W.S. 21-13-102(a)(ii)(A),” and made related changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

See conflicting legislation note below. This section has been set out incorporating amendments made by both 2004 acts.

The 2010 amendment,

inserted “but excluding any tuition assessed by a district for the provision of distance education programs to participating nonresident students pursuant to W.S.

21-13-330

” in (a)(ix).

Laws 2010, ch. 20 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2010.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added “or for the provision of educational programs to a nonresident student placed in a juvenile detention facility pursuant to an agreement with the student's resident school district” in (a)(ix).

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director” for “state superintendent” in (b).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, inserted “any revenues received by a district from post secondary education option programs provided under W.S.

21-20-201

” in (a)(ix).

The 2015 amendments. —

The first 2015 amendment, by ch. 30, § 1, in (b), substituted “state superintendent” for “director” twice.

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The second 2015 amendment, by ch. 131, § 1, substituted “W.S. 21-15-123(f)(vi)” for “W.S. 21-15-114(a)(x)” in (a)(xiv) and (a)(xv).

Laws 2015, ch. 131, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, inserted “any tuition assessed by a district for the provision of part-time educational programs to participating nonresident students pursuant to
W.S. 21-4-502(c)” preceding “any revenues” near the end of (a)(ix).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “virtual education” for “distance education” throughout the section; added the last sentence in (a)(xxxi)(A) , in (a)(xxxi)(B) added “including professional development for teachers and school administrators” in the first sentence and added the second sentence, rewrote (a)(xxxi)(D), which formerly read: “Establishing criteria and necessary components of individual student distance learning plans required by W.S.

21-13-330

,” added the second sentence of (a)(xxxi)(E), added (a)(xxxi)(F), and made related changes.

The 2021 amendment,

added "estimated" following "revenue collections" in (a)(i), (a)(ii)(A) and (a)(ii)(B); and rewrote (d), which read, "As used in this section, assessed valuation means the assessed valuation certified on August 10 under W.S.

39-11-102

.1(c)(v)."

Laws 2021, ch. 28, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 9, 2021.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Portions of this section as amended by Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, ch. 1) have been held unconstitutional.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Tax shortfall grants. —

If amounts represented by tax shortfall grants were previously reported as local resources in the form of estimated tax revenues, the requirements of the statute were satisfied and, therefore, school districts were not required to include the amount of the grants as local resources in their estimates for the subsequent year. Britton v. Halliburton Servs., 895 P.2d 45,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 1995).

Applied

in

Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

Lincoln County Sch. Dist. No. One v. State, 985 P.2d 964,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1999);
Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. Catchpole,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 147

, 6 P.3d 1275 (Wyo. 2000).

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

§ 21-13-311.
Determination of amount to be distributed to each district from foundation account; undistributed balance; prohibition on expenditures.

The amount of money which shall be distributed to each district from the foundation account shall be determined by subtracting the sum of the district revenues computed in accordance with W.S.

21-13-310

from the total amount of the foundation program computed in accordance with W.S.

21-13-309

.

Repealed by Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 304.

The amount of the foundation account which is not distributed in any year, for any reason, shall be held in the foundation account for distribution in subsequent years in accordance with this article.

Effective school year 2011-2012 and each school year thereafter, no foundation program funds distributed under subsection (a) of this section shall be expended by any district for conducting random drug testing of students within the district without prior approval of the student’s parents.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 119, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 21-69; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 234; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-234; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1983, ch. 136, § 2; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, §§ 304, 501; 2011, ch. 185, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (d).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 37, Section 13, provides: “Twenty-nine million six hundred sixty-nine thousand sixty-nine dollars ($29,669,069.00) is appropriated from the public school foundation program account to the department of education for payments to school districts in accordance with
W.S.

21-13-311

and
21-13-313(b), (c) and (g), to supplement amounts otherwise appropriated by the 2006 legislature in 2006 House Bill 0001 for the school foundation program.”

Cited

in

Britton v. Halliburton Servs., 895 P.2d 45,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

§ 21-13-312.
Prorating payments when income from foundation account insufficient.

To preserve the integrity of the foundation account for the biennium and so that payments can be made during the full school year for each year of the biennium, if it appears to the state superintendent that the income available to the foundation program account is not sufficient to meet the payments as provided by law:

The state superintendent shall determine a uniform percentage by which the amount guaranteed to each district under W.S.

21-13-309

shall be reduced so that available revenues in the foundation program account for that school year are as nearly as possible equal to the amount necessary to fund payments to districts under W.S.

21-13-313

; and

The revenue to be rebated by a district under W.S. 21-13-102(b) shall be adjusted based upon the guaranteed amount for that district determined under paragraph (a)(i) of this section.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 67, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 21-69.1; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 235; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-235; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1988, ch. 82, § 1; 1992, ch. 91, § 3; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 501; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director” for “state superintendent” in (a) and (a)(i).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “state superintendent” for “director” in the introductory language of (a) and (a)(i).

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

§ 21-13-313.
Distribution of funds from foundation account; property tax and cash reserve adjustment; regulations.

For each school year the state auditor, on the certification of the state superintendent, shall draw warrants on the state treasurer for the amount of money which shall be distributed to each district from the foundation account as computed under W.S.

21-13-311

. The warrants, payable to the treasurer of the district concerned, shall be delivered to the state superintendent for distribution to the several school districts.

The state superintendent shall determine on or before August 15 of each year the tentative allotment of foundation funds to which each district is entitled under this article. In making this determination, the state superintendent may, if current fiscal information required by law to compute the tentative allotment is not available for any district by August 1 of that year, use fiscal information available to the state superintendent from the foundation program computations of the previous school year for that district. The previous year’s fiscal information shall be adjusted to reflect current fiscal changes and other information known by or available to the state superintendent. Upon receiving actual fiscal information from a district, the state superintendent shall accordingly adjust future foundation program determinations for that district such that foundation program payments appropriately reflect current fiscal information for the applicable school year.

Fifteen percent (15%) of each district’s entitlement shall be paid to the district on or before August 15 of each year and subject to any adjustment under subsections (d) and (e) of this section, ten percent (10%) of each district’s entitlement shall be paid on or about the fifteenth day of each month through April of each year. The final payment for the balance of each district’s entitlement shall be distributed on or before May 15 of each year. If, after March 1 and before April 1, the state superintendent determines that the entitlement to be paid to a district for that school year is not accurate, the state superintendent shall adjust payments to or payments from that district as necessary to correct the inaccuracy as soon as practicable. Except as provided under W.S. 21-2-202(e), after March 31 of any school year, the state superintendent shall not adjust any district’s entitlement or fiscal information used to compute a district’s entitlement for that school year, and the entitlement or fiscal information shall only be adjusted thereafter in accordance with audit review pursuant to W.S.

9-1-513

.

On or before August 15 of the succeeding fiscal year, each school district shall report the amount of revenue it received during the preceding fiscal year attributable to levies provided by W.S. 21-13-102(a)(i)(A) and (ii)(A) and

21-13-201

regardless of the assessment year, but not to include assessments from years prior to July 1, 1991. If those revenues reported are less than the revenues estimated under W.S.

21-13-310

(a)(i) and (ii) for that fiscal year, as applicable, and if the district’s total revenues computed under W.S.

21-13-310

for that fiscal year continue to be less than the total foundation program amount computed under W.S.

21-13-309

, the school district shall be paid the difference by October 15 from the foundation program account. No amount in excess of the total foundation program amount computed for any district for that fiscal year shall be paid from the foundation program account for purposes of this subsection. Any amount paid under this subsection shall not thereafter be relevant to or used for future foundation program calculations. If those revenues reported are greater than the revenues estimated under W.S. 21-13-310(a)(i) and (ii) for that fiscal year, as applicable, the excess shall be included as revenues of the district under W.S. 21-13-310 in computing the foundation entitlement for the succeeding fiscal year.

Not later than January 31 of each fiscal year, and except where a different percentage is otherwise specified in this subsection, the department shall compute the amount by which each district’s operating balance and cash reserves at the end of the preceding fiscal year exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the total foundation program amount computed under W.S.

21-13-309

for the preceding fiscal year. In making this calculation, the entire operating balance and cash reserves for each district for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1997, as computed by the department, shall be separately accounted for and excluded, until it has been completely expended by the district. Revenues from settlements of protested amounts attributable to levies assessed under W.S.

21-13-102

(a)(i)(A) and (ii)(A) and

21-13-201

, regardless of the assessment year, shall be accounted for and excluded from the calculation under this subsection for a period of not more than one (1) year following that fiscal year in which the revenue was received by a district, as verified in writing by the district and certified by the county treasurer. Except as otherwise provided in 1997 Special Session Laws, chapter 3, section 306(e), as amended, and except as excluded under this subsection, that excess shall be deemed to be a state revenue under W.S. 21-13-310(a) for the purpose of determining distributions under W.S.

21-13-311

and amounts to be rebated under W.S.

21-13-102

. The department shall promulgate rules, including reporting requirements and procedures for districts, to implement this subsection. As used in this section, “operating balance and cash reserves” means those financial resources of the district which are not encumbered by the district board of trustees for expenditure to meet an existing legal obligation or otherwise restricted by law or regulation for expenditure on specific educational programs. For purposes of this subsection, any balance within a district’s separate account established under W.S. 21-15-109(e) for major building and facility repair and replacement shall be deemed restricted by law for expenditure as provided by W.S. 21-15-109(e) and shall not be considered an operating balance and cash reserve under this section. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2022 through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the department shall compute the amount by which each district’s operating balance and cash reserves at the end of the preceding fiscal year exceed thirty percent (30%) of the total foundation program amount computed under W.S.

21-13-309

for the preceding fiscal year. During this period, the amount of a district’s operating balance and cash reserves that may be increased from fifteen percent (15%) to thirty percent (30%) of the total foundation program amount computed under W.S. 21-13-309 for the preceding fiscal year shall be accounted for and reported separately and shall not be transferred or expended for purposes of capital construction. For purposes of this subsection, “capital construction” does not include major building and facility repair and replacement as defined under W.S. 21-15-109(a)(iii).

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 2, § 803.

In addition to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, the state superintendent shall, for any district subject to W.S. 21-13-102(b) as determined by the department for any school year, or for any district not subject to W.S. 21-13-102(b) whose entitlement amount determined under W.S. 21-13-311(a) for any school year is equal to or less than twenty percent (20%) of the foundation program amount computed under W.S.

21-13-309

(p), and upon demonstration by the district of financial need as documented by cash flow analysis, provide payments from the school foundation program account in an amount not to exceed one-fifth (1/5) of the foundation program amount computed for that district for that school year in accordance with W.S.

21-13-309

. The computed amount shall be paid to each eligible district on or before September 1 based upon tentative computations under W.S. 21-13-309, for which the department may use fiscal information available from foundation program computations for the previous school year in the manner provided under subsection (b) of this section. Any district receiving a payment under this subsection shall repay the foundation program account not later than December 15 of that school year.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 119, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 21-70; Laws 1959, ch. 67, § 8; 1969, ch. 111, § 236; W.S. Rev. 1957, § 21.1-236; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1983, ch. 136, § 2; 1987, ch. 218, § 2; 1993, ch. 107, § 1; 1994, ch. 17, § 1; 1995, ch. 199, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 305; 1998, ch. 2, §§ 602, 803; ch. 3, § 2; 1999, ch. 110, § 501; 2000, ch. 10, § 1; ch. 12, § 1; 2004, ch. 110, § 1; ch. 130 § 1; 2005, ch. 99, § 1; 2006, ch. 37, § 1, ch. 83, § 1; 2008, ch. 17, § 1; ch. 94, §
1; 2011, ch. 185, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2017 ch. 74, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2022 ch. 14, § 1, effective March 8, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to state board of education, see §

21-2-301

.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 110, § 1, effective July 1, 2004, added (g).

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 130, § 1, in (d), deleted “and (C)” following “21-13-102(a)(i)(A) and (ii)(A).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

See conflicting legislation note below. This section has been set out incorporating amendments made by both 2004 acts.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “and before April 1” in the third sentence and added the last sentence in (c).

The 2006 amendments. —

The first 2006 amendment, by ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2006, in (c), deleted “recalculation under W.S. 21-13-309(q) and” following “Subject to any,” and added the exception language at the beginning of the last sentence.

The second 2006 amendment, by ch. 83, § 1, in (e), inserted the third sentence, and inserted “and except as excluded under this subsection.”

Laws 2006, ch. 83, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 17, §
1, effective July 1, 2008, deleted “fifty percent (50%) of the amount received on or before January 31 of the school year in which received, and shall repay the remaining fifty percent (50%)” after “program account” in the last sentence of (g).

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 94, §
1, deleted the former third sentence of (g) which read: “The amount computed under this subsection shall be reduced by any recapture revenues of a district which exceed limitations imposed under W.S. 21-13-102(c), as established by the department for that district for the prior school year.”

Laws 2008, ch. 94, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2008.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, rewrote (c) and (g), modifying foundation account payment and recapturing schedules and advance payments as specified.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director” for “state superintendent” throughout the section.

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “state superintendent” for “director” in (a), (b), (c), and (g).

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (g), substituted “shall repay the foundation program account not later than” for “and repaying the foundation program account by” and deleted “shall not be assessed interest” following “that school year” in the third sentence; and deleted the last sentence which read: “After December 15, the district shall be assessed interest at a rate equal to the rate specified by W.S. 21-13-316(a) until the payment is repaid in full. In no event shall an advance payment under this subsection extend beyond and remain unpaid by any district, including interest, on and after June 15 of that school year.”

The 2022 amendment,

in (e), added “and except where a different percentage is otherwise specified in this subsection,” in the first sentence, and added the eighth through 10th sentences.

Laws 2022, ch. 14, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 8, 2022.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 2, § 803, effective July 1, 1998, repealed a subsection (f) that had been redesignated from former (e) by
Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 303, also effective July 1, 1998. This subsection (f) provided for the state superintendent to adopt regulations to implement this article.

Laws 2008, ch. 17, § 2, provides: “Nothing in this act is intended to be interpreted to modify the administration of school finance with respect to recapture payment schedules under W.S. 21-13-102(b) and recapture district entitlement loan repayment schedules under W.S. 21-13-313(g) for the 2007–2008 school year.”

Laws 2015, ch. 30, amending this section, states in relevant part: “in accordance with Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300 (Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014”

Laws 2015, ch. 179, amending this section, states in relevant part: “conforming Wyoming Statute to Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300 and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 37, Section 13, provides: “Twenty-nine million six hundred sixty-nine thousand sixty-nine dollars ($29,669,069.00) is appropriated from the public school foundation program account to the department of education for payments to school districts in accordance with
W.S.

21-13-311

and
21-13-313(b), (c) and (g), to supplement amounts otherwise appropriated by the 2006 legislature in 2006 House Bill 0001 for the school foundation program.”

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Cited

in

Britton v. Halliburton Servs., 895 P.2d 45,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Equal Protection and the Financing of Public Education in Wyoming,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1973).

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

§ 21-13-314.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 136, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 265, § 3, related to supplemental entitlements to school districts.